New Jersey, session 222, A4939.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. As used in this section: Department means the Department of Community Affairs. Substance use disorder means a disorder defined to be consistent with generally recognized independent standards of current medical practice referenced in the most current version of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders. b.    There is established a Recovery Housing Assistance Program, to be administered by the Department of Community Affairs in collaboration with the Department of Human Services.  The program shall be administered for the purpose of assisting individuals recovering from substance use disorder through providing: (1)  stable, temporary transitional housing, for a period not to exceed 12 months unless extended in compliance with rules and regulations adopted by the department; (2)  substance use specific support; (3)  workforce development services; and (4)  assistance in securing permanent housing upon program completion. c.  The program shall be administered in addition to, and in coordination with, any related existing programs and shall be administered Statewide.  Priority shall be given to individuals who are recently discharged from inpatient treatment or involved in the criminal justice system for substance use offenses. d.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall submit an annual report detailing the number of individuals served, housing stability rates, employment outcomes, and program expenditures to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature. e.     There is established a fund for the purpose of providing the moneys necessary to administer the Recovery Housing Assistance Program, which may be used for purposes that shall include, but shall not be limited to, funding for operational support for recovery residences and sober living homes, rental assistance, housing navigation services, substance use specific support services, and workforce development services. 2.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs, in collaboration with the Department of Human Services, shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations as necessary to effectuate the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.    There is appropriated $5 million from the General Fund to the fund established pursuant to subsection d. of section of 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) to effectuate the purposes of that section. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.